Nevada, session 83, AB93.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 617.135 is hereby amended to read as follows:
617.135 “Police officer” includes:
1. A sheriff, deputy sheriff, officer of a metropolitan police
department or city police officer;
2. A chief, inspector, supervisor, commercial officer or trooper
of the Nevada Highway Patrol Division of the Department of Public
Safety;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
3. A chief, investigator or agent of the Investigation Division
of the Department of Public Safety;
4. A chief, supervisor, investigator or training officer of the
Training Division of the Department of Public Safety;
5. A chief or investigator of an office of the Department of
Public Safety that conducts internal investigations of employees of
the Department of Public Safety or investigates other issues relating
to the professional responsibility of those employees;
6. A chief or investigator of the Department of Public Safety
whose duties include, without limitation:
(a) The execution, administration or enforcement of the
provisions of chapter 179A of NRS; and
(b) The provision of technology support services to the Director
and the divisions of the Department of Public Safety;
7. An officer or investigator of the Section for the Control of
Emissions From Vehicles and the Enforcement of Matters Related
to the Use of Special Fuel of the Department of Motor Vehicles;
8. An investigator of the Division of Compliance Enforcement
of the Department of Motor Vehicles;
9. A school police officer employed or appointed by the board
of trustees of a school district pursuant to NRS 391.281;
10. A member of the police department of the Nevada System
of Higher Education;
[10.] 11. A:
(a) Uniformed employee of; or
(b) Forensic specialist employed by,
 the Department of Corrections whose position requires regular
and frequent contact with the offenders imprisoned and subjects the
employee to recall in emergencies;
[11.] 12. A juvenile probation officer;
13. A parole and probation officer of the Division of Parole
and Probation of the Department of Public Safety;
[12.] 14. A forensic specialist or correctional officer employed
by the Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the Department
of Health and Human Services at facilities for mentally disordered
offenders;
[13.] 15. The State Fire Marshal and his or her assistant and
deputies;
[14.] 16. A game warden of the Department of Wildlife who
has the powers of a peace officer pursuant to NRS 289.280;
[15.] 17. A ranger or employee of the Division of State Parks
of the State Department of Conservation and Natural Resources who
has the powers of a peace officer pursuant to NRS 289.260;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
[16.] 18. A bailiff or a deputy marshal of the district court ,
municipal court or justice court whose duties require him or her to
carry a weapon and to make arrests; [and
17.] 19. An agricultural police officer appointed by the
Director of the State Department of Agriculture pursuant to NRS
561.225 who has the powers of a peace officer pursuant to
NRS 289.290 [.] ;
20. A marshal or deputy marshal of a city or town; and
21. Any category I peace officer as defined in NRS 289.460,
category II peace officer as defined in NRS 289.470 and category
III peace officer as defined in NRS 289.480 who is not otherwise
included in subsections 1 to 20, inclusive.
Sec. 1.5. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Public Safety for the cost of
annual physicals for the Chief Parole and Probation Officer of the
Division of Parole and Probation of the Department of Public Safety
and the police officers of the Capitol Police Division of the
Department of Public Safety the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ...................................... $3,235
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ...................................... $8,129
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 2. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 3. 1. This section and section 1.5 of this act become
effective on July 1, 2025.
2. Sections 1 and 2 of this act become effective on July 1,
2026.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)